fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-pimamon_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - pimamon - adsf : #  VII2on acc. Wolvengrey p. 394
  
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: pimamon
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: pimamonwa
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: pimamoniyiw
     pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: pimamoniyiwa

     PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [kî-pimamon]
     PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [kî-pimamonwa]
     PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [kî-pimamoniniw]
     PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [kî-pimamoniniwa]
     
     PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [ka-pimamon]
     PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [ka-pimamonwa]
     PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [ka-pimamoniniw]
     PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [ka-pimamoniniwa]
     
     PV/wî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [wî-pimamon]
     PV/wî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [wî-pimamonwa]
     PV/wî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [wî-pimamoniniw]
     PV/wî+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [wî-pimamoniniwa]

     PV/ê+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-pimamok]
     PV/ê+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-pimamoki]
     PV/ê+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-pimamoninik]
     PV/ê+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-pimamoniniki]

     PV/ê+PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-kî-pimamok]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-kî-pimamoki]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-kî-pimamoninik]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-kî-pimamoniniki]

     pimamon+V+II+Cond+3Sg: pimamoki
     pimamon+V+II+Cond+3Pl: pimamokwâwi
     pimamon+V+II+Cond+4Sg: pimamoniniki
     pimamon+V+II+Cond+4Pl: pimamoninikwâwi
